Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.130

Juvenile laws and court processes and procedures—Informational materials.

The administrator for the courts shall, in cooperation with juvenile courts, develop informational materials describing juvenile laws and juvenile court processes and procedures related to such laws, and make such information available to the public. Similar information shall also be made available for the non-English-speaking youth and their families.

[ 1993 c 415 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—1993 c 415: See note following RCW 2.56.030.